Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1402
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that agricultural data is a proprietary business asset that originates from the farm, land, devices, and equipment of agricultural producers. To protect the economic value of this data and the autonomy of Nebraska producers, the sale of such data shall be protected and the security of such data shall be maintained through reasonable safeguards.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 2.
July 18, 2026